Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-642
Lottery operator; conflict of interest prohibited.

(1) No sole proprietor, partner in a partnership, member in a limited liability company, officer or director of a corporation, or individual with a substantial interest in a sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation applying for a lottery operator license or licensed as a lottery operator shall be connected with or interested in, directly or indirectly, any person, partnership, limited liability company, firm, corporation, or other party licensed as a distributor, manufacturer, or manufacturer-distributor under section 9-255.07, 9-255.09, 9-330, 9-332, or 9-632.

(2) No member of the governing board or governing official of a county, city, or village shall be connected with or interested in, directly or indirectly, any lottery operator with whom the county, city, or village contracts to conduct its lottery or any manufacturer-distributor.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 82;

Laws 1991, LB 427, § 63;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 118;

Laws 1993, LB 563, § 14;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 112;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 18.